South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S734.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 9 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 9-1-110. (A)(1) If a state employee is convicted of, pleads guilty or nolo contendere to any crime involving criminal sexual misconduct with a minor or any crime involving the possession or distribution of child sexual abuse material, including child sexual abuse material that is artificial intelligence generated, then the state employee forfeits retirement benefits and health benefits attributable to the person's state employment. If the provisions of this section are utilized, the applicable retirement system must refund the person's employee contributions attributable to the person's service. (2) A state employee who has his retirement benefits or health benefits forfeited pursuant to this section is entitled to receive twenty-five percent of the lost benefit if he moves to a different state that does not share a border with a state that borders the State of South Carolina. (B) For purposes of this section: (1) "Health benefits" means any benefit received through an insurance program administered by the employee insurance program established pursuant to Article 5, Chapter 11, Title 1. (2) "Retirement benefits" means any benefit received by any retirement system administered pursuant to this title. (3) "Retirement system" means any retirement system administered pursuant to this title. (4) "State employee" means any individual employed by this State. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----